District of Columbia statutes.
8-1322

Rules.

(a)

Within 180 days from March 8, 1991, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter, including rules regarding the criteria for preparation of source reduction plans and the imposition of source reduction fees. The Mayor shall consult and give significant weight to the recommendations of the Litter and Solid Waste Reduction Commission in the issuance of rules to implement this subchapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 24
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-229, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 246
1981 Ed., § 6-738.
This section is referenced in § 8-1318 and § 8-1320.
Motor vehicles and traffic, uniform classification and commercial drivers’ licenses, “commercial motor vehicle” defined, see § 50-401.
Motor vehicles, moving infractions, application of law, see § 50-2302.01.